Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.323.060

Joint school districts—Directors—Vacancies.

A vacancy in the office of director of a joint district shall be filled in the manner provided by *RCW 28A.315.530 for filling vacancies, such appointment to be valid only until a director is elected and qualified to fill such vacancy at the next regular district election.

[ 1990 c 33 s 312; 1973 c 47 s 5; 1971 c 53 s 3; 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 134; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.57.260. Prior: 1947 c 266 s 28; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 4693-47. Formerly RCW 28A.315.400, 28A.57.260, 28.57.260.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 28A.315.530 was recodified as RCW 28A.343.370 pursuant to 1999 c 315 s 804.

Severability—1973 c 47: See note following RCW 28A.323.010.

Severability—1971 c 53: "If any provision of this 1971 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1971 c 53 s 6.]

Rights preserved—Severability—1969 ex.s. c 176: See notes following RCW 28A.310.010.